California, session 20252026, AB626.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 25292.06 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:25292.06. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, an operator of a single-walled underground storage tank (UST) who is acting in good faith to comply with the requirements of Section 25292.05 to upgrade to a double-walled UST by December 31, 2025, shall not be subject to the penalties outlined in subdivision (b) of Section 25299, if all of the following conditions are met:(1) The operator has submitted a complete application for all necessary permits to upgrade or replace the single-walled UST no later than September 30, 2025.(2) The operator has demonstrated to the satisfaction of the local enforcement agency that delays in obtaining the required permits are beyond the operator’s control and are due to circumstances, including, but not limited to, administrative backlogs, incomplete reviews, or other permitting-related delays.(3) The operator continues to operate the single-walled UST in compliance with all other applicable requirements of this chapter, including leak detection and secondary containment measures, to minimize environmental risks during the grace period.(b) An operator seeking relief pursuant to this section shall submit a written request to the local enforcement agency, before September 30, 2025, including documentation of good faith efforts to comply and evidence of delays. The local enforcement agency shall review the request and issue a determination within 60 days of receipt. The local agency shall provide the determination to both the tank operator and the state board.(c) This section does not waive the requirement for eventual compliance with Section 25292.05 or preclude the imposition of penalties for noncompliance with other provisions of this chapter.SEC. 2.  If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SEC. 3. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:In order to avert economic harm to operators of a single-wall underground storage tank who have made a good faith effort to comply with existing law, it is necessary that this bill take effect immediately.SECTION 1.Section 25292.06 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:25292.06.(a)Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, an operator of a single-walled underground storage tank (UST) who is acting in good faith to comply with the requirements of Section 25292.05 to upgrade to a double-walled UST by December 31, 2025, shall not be subject to the penalties outlined in subdivision (b) of Section 25299, if all of the following conditions are met:(1)The operator has submitted a complete application for all necessary permits to upgrade or replace the single-walled UST no later than December 31, 2025.(2)The operator has demonstrated to the satisfaction of the local enforcement agency that delays in obtaining the required permits are beyond the operator’s control and are due to circumstances, including, but not limited to, administrative backlogs, incomplete reviews, or other permitting-related delays.(3)The operator continues to operate the single-walled UST in compliance with all other applicable requirements of this chapter, including leak detection and secondary containment measures, to minimize environmental risks during the grace period.(b)An operator seeking relief pursuant to this section shall submit a written request to the local enforcement agency, including documentation of good-faith efforts to comply and evidence of delays. The local enforcement agency shall review the request and issue a determination within 60 days of receipt.(c)This section does not waive the requirement for eventual compliance with Section 25292.05 or preclude the imposition of penalties for noncompliance with other provisions of this chapter.SEC. 2.If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.___________________ CORRECTIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________